Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 8.
QUALIFICATIONS OF ELECTORS (CONST., ART. 3, § 1, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 3, § 1, and is incorporated therein. The amendment was proposed in the 1919 session (see Acts 1919, p. 489) and voted upon at the general election of 1920, with the following results: for, 87,237; against, 49,751. It was declared to be in force by the Attorney General. See the decisions in Brickhouse v. Hill, 167 Ark. 513, 268 S.W. 865 (1925), and Combs v. Gray, 170 Ark. 956, 281 S.W. 918 (1926).

The poll tax requirement of this amendment was repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 51, § 17.